Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-201 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Subject to the availability of funds, Seven Million Five
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00) shall be allocated by the
State Board of Education to provide grants to public middle schools,
junior high schools, and high schools to incentivize phone-free
spaces for student learning.
B. 1. A public school district seeking a grant to establish a
phone-free space in a middle school, junior high school, or high
school site shall apply to the State Board of Education in the
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1277 Page 1

mann er and on a form prescribed by the Board. The Board shall
prioritize school districts that submit an application by July 1,
2025. Any applications received after July 1, 2025, shall be
considered on a first come, first served basis.
2. After reviewing the applications submitted, the Board shall
attempt to select recipients equally from each of the following
criteria:
a. middle schools, junior high schools, and high schools
that each have an average daily membership (ADM) of
fewer than five hundred (500) students,
b. middle schools, junior high schools, and high schools
that each have an ADM of five hundred (500) or more
students but fewer than one thousand five hundred
(1,500) students, and
c. middle schools, junior high schools, and high schools
that each have an ADM of one thousand five hundred
(1,500) or more students.
3. When selecting grant recipients pursuant to this subsection,
the Board shall attempt to select a variety of schools which are
broadly representative of schools in the state in terms of
geographic location and student population.
C. The grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be used to
purchase devices or equipment in which students enrolled in a grant
recipient school site can store their cell phones during the school
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1277 Page 2

day. In conjunction with the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services, the State Board of Education may negotiate and contract
with a vendor to offer a state rate price for devices or equipment
to grant recipient school sites.
Passed the House of Representatives the 13th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate












ENGR. H. B. NO. 1277 Page 3